cs: Detekované plyny: Butan; Oxid uhličitý (CO2); Oxid uhelnatý (CO); Difluormethan; LPG; Metan; Zemní plyn; Propan; Radon; Trichlormethan; Jiné
zh-CN: 探测到的气体: 丁烷; 二氧化碳 (CO2); 一氧化碳 (CO); 二氟甲烷; LPG; 甲烷; 天然气; 丙烷; 氡; 三氯甲烷; 其他
zh-TW: 偵測到的氣體: 丁烷; 二氧化碳 (CO2); 一氧化碳 (CO); 二氟甲烷; 液化石油氣; 甲烷; 天然氣; 丙烷; 氡; 三氯甲烷; 其他
bg-BG: Разпознати газове: Бутан; Въглероден диоксид (CO2); Въглероден оксид (CO); Дифлуорометан; LPG; Метан; Природен газ; Пропан; Радон; Трихлорметан; Други
el: Εντοπίστηκαν αέρια: Βουτάνιο; Διοξείδιο του άνθρακα (CO2); Μονοξείδιο του άνθρακα (CO); Διφθορομεθάνιο; LPG; Μεθάνιο; Φυσικό αέριο; Προπάνιο; Ραδόνιο; Τριχλωρομεθάνιο; Άλλο
en: Gases detected: Butane; Carbon dioxide (CO2); Carbon monoxide (CO); Difluoromethane; LPG; Methane; Natural gas; Propane; Radon; Trichloromethane; Other
ja: 検出されたガス: ブタン; 二酸化炭素 (CO2); 一酸化炭素 (CO); ジフルオロメタン; LPG; メタン; 天然ガス; プロパン; ラドン; トリクロロメタン; その他
ko: 가스 감지됨: 뷰테인; 이산화탄소(CO2); 일산화탄소(CO); 다이플루오로메테인; LPG; 메테인; 천연가스; 프로페인; 라돈; 트라이클로로메테인; 기타
es: Gases detectados: Butano; Dióxido de carbono (CO2); Monóxido de carbono; Difluorometano; LPG; Metano; Gas natural; Propano; Radón; Triclorometano; Otros
pt-PT: Gases detetados: Butano; Dióxido de carbono (CO2); Monóxido de carbono (CO); Difluorometano; LPG; Metano; Gás natural; Propano; Rádon; Triclorometano; Outro
hu: Észlelt gázok: Bután; Szén-dioxid (CO2); Szén-monoxid (CO); Difluor-metán; LPG; Metán; Földgáz; Propán; Radon; Triklór-metán; Egyéb
th: ก๊าซที่ตรวจพบ: บิวเทน; คาร์บอนไดออกไซด์ (CO2); คาร์บอนมอนออกไซด์ (CO); ไดฟลูออโรมีเทน; LPG; มีเทน; แก๊สธรรมชาติ; โพรเพน; เรดอน; ไตรคลอโรมีเทน; อื่นๆ
de: Gase erkannt: Butan; Kohlendioxid (CO2); Kohlenmonoxid (CO); Difluormethan; LPG; Methan; Erdgas; Propan; Radon; Trichlormethan; Sonstiges
pl: Wykryte gazy: Butan; Dwutlenek węgla (CO2); Tlenek węgla (CO); Difluorometan; Gaz płynny; Metan; Gaz ziemny; Propan; Radon; Trichlorometan; Inne
tr: Tespit Edilen Gazlar: Bütan; Karbondioksit (CO2); Karbon monoksit (CO); Diflorometan; LPG; Metan; Doğal gaz; Propan; Radon; Trichloromethane; Diğer
sv: Upptäckta gaser: Butan; Koldioxid (CO2); Kolmonoxid (CO); Difluormetan; LPG; Metan; Naturgas; Propan; Radon; Triklormetan; Övrigt
lt-LT: Aptinkamos dujos: Butanas; Anglies dioksidas (CO2); Anglies monoksidas (CO); Difluormetanas; LPG; Metanas; Gamtinės dujos; Propanas; Radonas; Trichlormetanas; Kita
it: Gas rilevati: Butano; Anidride carbonica (CO2); Monossido di carbonio (CO); Difluorometano; LPG; Metano; Gas naturale; Propano; Radon; Triclorometano; Altro
sk-SK: Zistené plyny: Bután; Oxid uhličitý (CO2); Oxid uhoľnatý (CO); Difluórmetán; LPG; Metán; Zemný plyn; Propán; Radón; Trichlórmetán; Iné
ru: Обнаруживаемые газы: Бутан; Углекислый газ (CO2); Угарный газ (CO); Дифторметан; СУГ; Метан; Природный газ; Пропан; Радон; Трихлорметан; Другой
hr-HR: Plinovi koje uređaj detektira: Butan; Ugljični dioksid (CO2); Ugljični monoksid (CO); Difluormetan; LPG; Metan; Prirodni plin; Propan; Radon; Triklormetan; Ostalo
nb: Gasser oppdaget: Butan; Karbondioksid (CO2); Karbonmonoksid (CO); Difluormetan; LPG; Metan; Naturgass; Propan; Radon; Triklormetan; Annet
nl: Gedetecteerde gassen: Butaan; Kooldioxide (CO2); Koolmonoxide (CO); Difluormethaan; LPG; Methaan; Aardgas; Propaan; Radon; Trichloormethaan; Andere
fr: Gaz détectés: Butane; Dioxyde de carbone (CO2); Monoxyde de carbone (CO); Difluorométhane; GPL; Méthane; Gaz naturel; Propane; Radon; Trichlorométhane; Autre
vi: Phát hiện khí: Butane; Carbon dioxide (CO2); Carbon monoxide (CO); Difluoromethane; LPG; Methane; Khí tự nhiên; Propane; Radon; Trichloromethane; Khác
fi: Havaitut kaasut: Butaani; Hiilidioksidi (CO2); Hiilimonoksidi (CO); Difluorimetaani; LPG; Metaani; Luonnonkaasu; Propaani; Radon; trikloorimetaani; Muu
ro-RO: Gaze detectate: Butan; Dioxid de carbon (CO2); Monoxid de carbon (CO); Difluormetan; LPG; Metan; Gaz natural; Propan; Radon; Triclormetan; Altele
sl-SI: Zaznani plini: Butan; Ogljikov dioksid (CO2); Ogljikov monoksid (CO); Difluorometan; LPG; Metan; Zemeljski plin; Propan; Radon; Triklorometan; Drugo
pt-BR: Gases detectados: Butano; Dióxido de carbono (CO2); Monóxido de carbono (CO); Difluorometano; GLP; Metano; Gás natural; Propano; Radônio; Triclorometano; Outro
da: Gasser påvist: Butan; Kuldioxid (CO2); Kulilte (CO); Difluormethan; LPG; Metan; Naturgas; Propan; Radon; Trichlormethan; Andet